Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1217
Motorboat; registration; fee to recover
administrative costs.

When the county treasurer or
the commission registers a vessel, such county treasurer or the commission
shall be entitled to collect and retain a fee, in addition to the registration
fee, of not less than three dollars and not more than four dollars on each
registration issued, as established by the commission pursuant to section
37-327, as reimbursement for administrative costs incurred in issuing such
certificate of registration. Such fee shall be credited to the general fund
of the county and shall be included by the county treasurer in his or her
report of fees as provided by law.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 17;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 37;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 397;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 22;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 9.